Maine, session 132, LD262.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §1402, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 658, §236, is
further amended to read:
2. Taste testing on retail licensee's premises or other venue. With the bureau's
written permission, a wholesale licensee may rent or lease an area or room from an on-
premises retail licensee or from any unlicensed venue for the purpose of inviting retail
licensees to taste test wine or malt liquor products.
Sec. 2. 28-A MRSA §1402, sub-§3, ¶D, as amended by PL 2021, c. 658, §237, is
further amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0800(03)

D. After the taste-testing event is concluded, the wholesale licensee shall remove all
products supplied for the taste-testing event from the premises of the retail licensee's
premises licensee or unlicensed venue.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR0800(03)